Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-165
Nuckolls.

The county of Nuckolls is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township one, north, of range eight, west; thence east along the base line to the southeast corner of said township in range five, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township four, north, of range five, west; thence west to the northwest corner of said township in range eight, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 38, p. 219;

R.S.1913, § 880;

C.S.1922, § 782;

C.S.1929, § 25-169;

R.S.1943, § 22-165.